src/fst/affixes/VTA_suffixes.lexc
LEXICON VTA_N_NONE_Endings
+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+3PlProx:aasiidogenag # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaasiidogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+3SgProx:aasiidog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+3PlProx:aasiiwag # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaasiiwan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+3SgProx:aasiin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+3PlProx:aasiibaneg # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaasiibanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+3SgProx:aasiiban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+3PlProx:aadogenag # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+3SgProx:aadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+3PlProx:aawag # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaawan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+3SgProx:aa # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+3PlProx:aabaneg # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaabanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+3SgProx:aaban # ;

LEXICON VTA_N_ni_WB
0:%>%> VTA_N_ni_Endings ;

LEXICON VTA_N_ni_Endings
+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0Pl+1Sg:igosiinaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0Pl+Excl:igosiiminaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0Sg+1Sg:igosiinaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0Sg+Excl:igosiiminaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3PlProx:aasiidogenag # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaasiidogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3SgProx:aasiidog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+1Sg:igosiidogenag # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+Excl:igosiinaadogenag # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+1Sg:igosiidog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+Excl:igosiinaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+3PlProx:aasiwaanaadogenag # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaasiwaanaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+3SgProx:aasiwaanaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+1Sg:igoosiinaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+Excl:igoosiiminaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0Pl+1Sg:igosiinan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0Pl+Excl:igosiimin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0Sg+1Sg:igosiin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0Sg+Excl:igosiimin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+3PlProx:aasiig # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaasiin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+3SgProx:aasiin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+1Sg:igosiig # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+Excl:igosiinaanig # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+1Sg:igosiin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+Excl:igosiinaan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+3PlProx:aasiwaanaanig # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaasiwaanaan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+3SgProx:aasiwaanaan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+1Sg:igoosiin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+Excl:igoosiimin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0Pl+1Sg:igosiinaabanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0Pl+Excl:igosiiminaabanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0Sg+1Sg:igosiinaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0Sg+Excl:igosiiminaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3PlProx:aasiibaneg # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaasiibanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3SgProx:aasiiban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+1Sg:igosiibaneg # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+Excl:igonaabaneg # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+1Sg:igosiiban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+Excl:igosiinaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+3PlProx:aasiwaanaabaneg # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaasiwaanaabanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+3SgProx:aasiwaanaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+1Sg:igoosiinaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+Excl:igoosiiminaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0Pl+1Sg:igonaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0Pl+Excl:igominaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0Sg+1Sg:igonaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0Sg+Excl:igominaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3PlProx:aadogenag # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3SgProx:aadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+1Sg:igodogenag # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+Excl:igonaadogenag # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+1Sg:igodog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+Excl:igonaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+3PlProx:aanaadogenag # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaanaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+3SgProx:aanaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+1Sg:igoonaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+Excl:igoominaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0Pl+1Sg:igonan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0Pl+Excl:igomin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0Sg+1Sg:igon # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0Sg+Excl:igomin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3PlProx:aag # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3SgProx:aa # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+1Sg:igoog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+Excl:igonaanig # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+1Sg:ig # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+Excl:igonaan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+3PlProx:aanaanig # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaanaan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+3SgProx:aanaan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+1Sg:igoo # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+Excl:igoomin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0Pl+1Sg:igonaabanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0Pl+Excl:igominaabanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0Sg+1Sg:igonaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0Sg+Excl:igominaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3PlProx:aabaneg # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaabanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3SgProx:aaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+1Sg:igobaneg # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+Excl:igosiinaabaneg # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+1Sg:igoban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+Excl:igonaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+3PlProx:aanaabaneg # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaanaabanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+3SgProx:aanaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+1Sg:igoonaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+Excl:igoominaaban # ;

LEXICON VTA_N_o_WB
0:%>%> VTA_N_o_Endings ;

LEXICON VTA_N_o_Endings
+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0Pl+3PlProx:igosiinaawaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv:igosiininaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0Pl+3SgProx:igosiinaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0Sg+3PlProx:igosiinaawaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv:igosiininaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0Sg+3SgProx:igosiinaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv:aasiwaawaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx:igosiiwaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx:igosiidogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv:aasiidogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0Pl+3PlProx:igosiinaawaan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv:igosiinini # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0Pl+3SgProx:igosiinan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0Sg+3PlProx:igosiinaawaa # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv:igosiinini # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0Sg+3SgProx:igosiin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv:aasiwaawaan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx:igosiiwaan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx:igosiin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv:aasiin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0Pl+3PlProx:igosiinaawaabanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv:igosiininaabanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0Pl+3SgProx:igosiinaabanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0Sg+3PlProx:igosiinaawaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv:igosiininaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0Sg+3SgProx:igosiinaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv:aasiwaawaabanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx:igosiiwaabanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx:igosiibanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv:aasiibanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0Pl+3PlProx:igonaawaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv:igoninaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0Pl+3SgProx:igonaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0Sg+3PlProx:igonaawaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv:igoninaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0Sg+3SgProx:igonaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv:aawaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx:igowaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx:igodogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv:aadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0Pl+3PlProx:igonaawaan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv:igonini # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0Pl+3SgProx:igonan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0Sg+3PlProx:igonaawaa # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv:igonini # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0Sg+3SgProx:igon # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv:aawaan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx:igowaan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx:igoon # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv:aan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0Pl+3PlProx:igonaawaabanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv:igoninaabanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0Pl+3SgProx:igonaabanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0Sg+3PlProx:igonaawaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv:igoninaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0Sg+3SgProx:igonaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv:aawaabanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx:igowaabanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx:igobanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv:aabanen # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!                                              !!
!!   Endings: Verb Class = VTA, Stem Type = S   !!
!!                                              !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VTA_S_Subclass
+VTA:0 VTA_S_Flags ;

LEXICON VTA_S_Flags
@R.Prefix.NONE@ VTA_S_NONE_WB ;
@R.Prefix.gi@ VTA_S_gi_WB ;
@R.Prefix.ni@ VTA_S_ni_WB ;
@R.Prefix.o@ VTA_S_o_WB ;

LEXICON VTA_S_NONE_WB
0:%>%> VTA_S_NONE_Endings ;

LEXICON VTA_S_NONE_Endings
+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+3PlProx:aasiidogenag # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaasiidogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+3SgProx:aasiidog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+3PlProx:aasiiwag # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaasiiwan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+3SgProx:aasiin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+3PlProx:aasiibaneg # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaasiibanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+3SgProx:aasiiban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+3PlProx:aadogenag # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+3SgProx:aadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+3PlProx:aawag # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaawan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+3SgProx:aa # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+3PlProx:aabaneg # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+3SgObv/3PlObv:imaabanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+3SgProx:aaban # ;

LEXICON VTA_S_ni_WB
0:%>%> VTA_S_ni_Endings ;
